Arkansas, session 2025, SB32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 2 GRADE MP01
(3) N111N DHS ASST DEP DIR FOR MGR ACCOUNTING 1 GRADE GS13
(4) M003C DHS BEHAV HLTH CHILDRENS SYST CARE DIR 1 GRADE GS13
(5) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
*LCW017*
01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017

SB32
(6) N156N BEHAV HLTH ASST DIR CHILDRENS SVS 1 GRADE GS12
(7) G027N DHS RESEARCH ANALYSIS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(8) G255C DYS ACADEMIC ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(9) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 6 GRADE GS09
(10) E015C SPECIAL EDUCATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(11) M008C YOUTH PROGRAM DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS09
(12) E035C CERTIFIED MASTERS TEACHER 3 GRADE GS08
(13) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 11 GRADE GS08
(14) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(15) M012C YOUTH PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(16) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 5 GRADE GS07
(17) G082C DHS/DYS ADMISSIONS EVALUATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(18) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS07
(19) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(20) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(21) E044C CERTIFIED BACHELORS TEACHER 5 GRADE GS06
(22) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 10 GRADE GS06
(23) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(24) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(25) X101C INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(26) G166C MILITARY PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS06
(27) M047C YOUTH SERVICES ADVISOR 11 GRADE GS06
(28) M060C YOUTH PROGRAM COORDINATOR 10 GRADE GS05
(29) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 4 GRADE GS04
(30) T072C SECURITY OFFICER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(31) T084C PUBLIC SAFETY SECURITY OFFICER 14 GRADE GS03
(32) M070C YOUTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST 9 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 121

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirty-six (36) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017

SB32
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Youth Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $6,012,863
(02) EXTRA HELP 41,903
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,360,444
(04) OVERTIME 8,699
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,257,099
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 55,400
(C) PROF. FEES 609,050
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 105,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $14,450,458

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - COMMUNITY BASED SANCTIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth
Services, to be payable from the Youth Services Fund Account, for grants and
aid for graduated community based sanctions for juveniles adjudicated
delinquent for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COMMUNITY BASED SANCTIONS $2,480,444

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - COMMUNITY SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Youth Services Fund Account, for purchase of services from community based
providers by the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services
01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017

SB32
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COMMUNITY SERVICES $13,821,100

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL CHILD AND YOUTH SERVICE GRANTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for federally funded grants of the Department of Human Services -
Division of Youth Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FEDERAL CHILD AND YOUTH SERVICE GRANTS $17,832,942

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - RESIDENTIAL SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Youth Services Fund Account, for the purchase and operation of residential
services by the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RESIDENTIAL SERVICES $34,616,356

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF FUNDS FOR THE JUVENILE OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM. The Department of Human
Services shall provide funding in an amount not to exceed $240,000 for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026 for the Juvenile Ombudsman Program
described in ACA 16-87-216. Upon request by the Executive Director of the
Arkansas Public Defender Commission, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall transfer an amount not to exceed $240,000 for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025 2026 from an account designated by the Secretary of the
01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017

SB32
Department of Human Services to the State Central Services Fund as a direct
revenue to fund the Juvenile Ombudsman Program.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF FUNDS FOR LOCAL JUVENILE DETENTION FACILITIES. The Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State shall transfer funds in an amount of $400,000 for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025 2026 from the Department of Human Services – Youth
Services Fund Account to the Juvenile Detention Facilities Operating Fund to
fund the appropriation to the Department of Finance and Administration –
Disbursing Officer for grants for operating expenses of local juvenile
detention facilities.
The amount of the funds transferred in the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025 2026 may be adjusted upon request of the Secretary of the Department of
Human Services on a pro-rata basis with any reductions provided in the
Revenue Stabilization Law from the July 1 Official Forecast of general
revenue funding for the Division of Youth Services.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
RESIDENTIAL SERVICES CONTINGENCY. If it has been determined that the
Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services cannot continue to
contract with private provider(s) for residential juvenile services,
educational services, therapeutic services, and/or medical services and deems
it necessary to utilize Department staff to provide all or parts of the
required services above, the Department is authorized to seek the approval of
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Governor and the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee to utilize the contingent
residential services positions contained in this Act and to make the
appropriate transfers from any line item authorized in the RESIDENTIAL
SERVICES appropriation of this Act to any line item authorized in the
OPERATIONS appropriation of this Act. If it has been determined that the
01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017

SB32
Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services cannot continue to
operate one or more of the various service components of a Residential
Facility for residential juvenile services, educational services, therapeutic
services, and/or medical services and deems it necessary to utilize a
contract with private provider(s), the Department is authorized to seek the
approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Governor and the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee to make the
appropriate transfers from any line item authorized in the OPERATIONS
appropriation of this Act to any line item authorized in the RESIDENTIAL
SERVICES appropriation of this Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EXTRA
HELP SALARIES - CONTINGENT RESIDENTIAL SERVICES POSITIONS. There is hereby
established for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services
- Contingent Residential Services Positions, the following maximum number of
positions whose salaries shall be governed by the provisions of the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act (Arkansas Code § 21-5-201 et seq.), or
its successor, and all laws amendatory thereto. Requests to use positions
will be based upon the non-contracted services for residential juvenile
services, educational services, therapeutic services, and/or medical
services. If at such time a category(s) of services are contracted with
private provider(s), identified positions associated with such service(s)
shall be returned to the contingency pool. In order to ensure required
staffing levels, Extra Help positions authorized herein are specifically
exempt from limitation of hours, either by Act or regulation.

CONTINGENT POSITIONS - RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
MAXIMUM
ITEM CLASS NO. OF
NO. CODE TITLE EMPLOYEES
(01) 9999 EXTRA HELP 320
GRAND TOTAL CONTINGENT POSITIONS 320

01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017

SB32
The provisions of this section shall be in effect through June 30, 2025 2026.


SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



01/08/2025 3:20:28 PM LCW017